Ohio, session 136, HB918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4928.531 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4928.531. For purposes of the summer crisis program administered under the home energy assistance program, a household containing at least one member who is five years of age or younger shall be eligible for summer crisis assistance.